California, session 20252026, AB1075.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14868 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:14868. (a) The office, in collaboration with the department and the board of directors of the FIRESCOPE Program, shall develop regulations to govern the use of equipment used by privately contracted private fire prevention resources during an active fire incident. The regulations shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(1) All equipment shall be clearly labeled nonemergency.(2) Privately contracted private fire prevention resource vehicles shall not use emergency lights or sirens.(3) Privately contracted private fire prevention resource vehicles shall not have any labeling that indicates emergency personnel or fire department.(4) Privately contracted private fire prevention resources shall not hook up their equipment to public water sources, unless approved by incident command or the authority having jurisdiction over the active fire incident and unless the equipment includes a backflow prevention device.(b) The office may consult with both private sector entities that provide privately contracted private fire prevention resources and public sector fire agencies before developing the regulations as required by this section.(c) Nothing in this section shall alter, impair, or interfere with the authority of a community water system to operate a water distribution system, as defined in Section 116275.